California, session 20252026, AB1653.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 51900.4 is added to the Education Code, to read:51900.4. (a) (1) During the next revision of the publication “Health Framework for California Public Schools” (health framework), the Instructional Quality Commission shall consider including, and recommending for adoption by the state board, specific content related to the prevention of, and recognizing and responding to the signs and symptoms of, heat illness.(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), the commission shall consider relevant heat illness prevention measures, heat illness signs and symptoms, and heat illness responses, as addressed by guidance issued by the State Department of Public Health and policies adopted by the California Interscholastic Federation.(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), all of the following apply:(1) “Prevention of heat illness” includes, but is not limited to, measures to stay cool, hydrated, connected to others, and informed of heat alerts.(2) “Recognizing the signs and symptoms of heat illness” includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:(A) A red or flushed face.(B) Nausea.(C) Muscle cramps.(D) Headache.(E) Dizziness.(F) Fatigue or weakness.(G) Confusion.(H) Heavy sweating or the lack of sweating.(3) “Responding to signs and symptoms of heat illness” includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:(A) Stopping physical activity.(B) Seeking shade or a cool area.(C) Drinking water or otherwise hydrating.(D) Cooling the body.(E) Notifying a teacher, staff member, or other responsible adult.